District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.05

Power of corporation to acquire its own shares.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 181, ch. 269, § 5
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(a), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.05.
1981 Ed., § 29-305.
1973 Ed., § 29-904a.